Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB782.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8346(b.2) heading, (1) and (2) of Title 24 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 8346. Termination of annuities.* * *(b.2) Limitation on return to school service by an annuitant [during emergency or in an extracurricular position].--(1) An annuitant may return to school service under subsection (b) [or], (b.1) or (b.3), provided the annuitant otherwise meets the requirements of subsection (b) [or], 123456789101112131415161718192021 (b.1) or (b.3) and has attained the age set forth in IRC § 401(a)(36) or the applicable "normal retirement age" in 26 C.F.R. § 1.401(a)-1(b)(2) (relating to post-ERISA qualified plans and qualified trusts; in general).(2) An annuitant who has not reached the age as set forth in IRC § 401(a)(36), or the applicable "normal retirement age" under 26 C.F.R. § 1.401(a)-1(b)(2), may return to service under subsection (b) [or], (b.1) or (b.3) provided the annuitant otherwise meets the requirements of subsection (b) [or], (b.1) or (b.3) and has had a break in service, as set forth in paragraph (3).* * *(b.3) Return to school service as a police instructor or emergency medical services instructor.--(1) An annuitant or participant receiving distributions may be employed in the following capacity for a school employer without loss of annuity:(i) a part-time instructor teaching a basic police training course or an in-service police training course that is approved by the Municipal Police Officers' Education and Training Commission for any school employer; or(ii) a part-time emergency medical services instructor under 35 Pa.C.S. § 8124 (relating to emergency medical services instructors) for any school employer.(2) The annuitant or the participant receiving distributions under paragraph (1) and the school employer of the annuitant or participant shall not make contributions to the member's savings account, individual investment account or State accumulation account, respectively, for service 20250SB0782PN0844 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this subsection. Service under paragraph (1) shall not be subject to member or participant contributions or be eligible for qualification as creditable school service or for participation in the plan, mandatory pickup participant contributions or employer defined contributions.* * *Section 2. Sections 5301(d) and 5706(a)(2) and (a.5) of Title 71 are amended to read:§ 5301. Mandatory and optional membership in the system and participation in the plan.* * *(d) Return to service.--(1) An annuitant who returns to service as a State employee before January 1, 2019, or returns to State service as a Class A-5 exempt employee after December 31, 2018, shall resume active membership in the system as of the effective date of employment, except as otherwise provided in section 5706(a) and (a.1) (relating to termination of annuities), regardless of the optional membership category of the position.(2) An annuitant or a participant receiving distributions who returns to service as a State employee on or after January 1, 2019, shall resume active membership in the system and, if an active member of Class A-5 or Class A-6, shall be an active participant in the plan as of the effective date of employment, except as otherwise provided in section 5706(a) and (a.1), regardless of the optional membership or participation category of the position: Provided, however, That a participant or former participant who previously elected to be solely a participant under 20250SB0782PN0844 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 5306.4 or 5306.5 shall be a participant in the plan and not an active member of the system, except for service as a Class A-5 exempt employee.* * *§ 5706. Termination of annuities.(a) General rule.--* * *(2) This subsection shall not apply in the case of any annuitant who:(i) may render services to the Commonwealth in the capacity of an independent contractor; or(ii) is over normal retirement age or who has been an annuitant for more than one year and who may render service to the Commonwealth:(A) as a member of an independent board or commission or as a member of a departmental administrative or advisory board or commission when such members of independent or departmental boards or commissions are compensated on a per diem basis for not more than 150 days per calendar year; [or](B) as a member of an independent board or commission requiring appointment by the Governor, with advice and consent of the Senate, where the annual salary payable to the member does not exceed $35,000 and where the member has been an annuitant for at least six months immediately preceding the appointment[.];(C) as a part-time fire instructor at any of the following who has received certification as a firefighter training instructor from the Pennsylvania 20250SB0782PN0844 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State Fire Academy : (I) the Pennsylvania State Fire Academy;(II) the Department of Education;(III) a State-owned educational institution;(IV) a community college; or(V) The Pennsylvania State University ; (D) as a part-time instructor teaching a basic police training course or an in-service police training course that is approved by the Municipal Police Officers' Education and Training Commission at any State Employees' Retirement System employer; or(E) as a part-time emergency medical services instructor under 35 Pa.C.S. § 8124 (relating to emergency medical services instructors) at any State Employees' Retirement System employer.* * *(a.5) No contributions or credited service.--The service of an annuitant whose annuity does not cease upon his return to State or school service shall not be subject to member contributions or eligible for qualification as creditable State service [and], shall not be eligible for participation in the plan, mandatory pickup participant contributions, voluntary contributions or employer defined contributions[.], shall not be subject to school employee member contributions to the Public School Employees' Retirement System or eligible for qualification as creditable school service in the Public School Employees' Retirement System and shall not be eligible for participation as a school employee in the School Employees' Defined Contribution Plan or any type of contributions to the School Employees' Defined Contribution Plan.20250SB0782PN0844 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 3. This act shall apply only to service as a State-certified fire instructor, police instructor or emergency medical services instructor performed after the effective date of this section without regard to whether the service as an annuitant began before or after the effective date of this section.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0782PN0844 - 6 - 12345678